Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 5. Solid Waste Management

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Hazardous Waste Cleanup in Wyoming: Legal Tools Available to the Private Citizen,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 395 (1984).

For case note, “Hazardous Waste — The Supreme Court's Interpretation of RCRA: An Inequitable Result. KFC Western, Inc. v. Meghrig, 516 U.S. 479, 116 S. Ct. 1251, 134 L. Ed. 2d 121, 1996 U.S. LEXIS 1955 (1996),” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 699 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

61C Am. Jur. 2d Pollution Control §§ 1134 to 1269.

State and local regulation of private landowner's disposal of solid waste on own property, 37 ALR4th 635.

Relief available in citizen's suit under 42 USC § 6972 for violation of federal requirements relating to solid or hazardous waste, 71 ALR Fed 181.

39A C.J.S. Health and Environment §§ 45, 129, 133 to 157.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
172.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 35-11-501.
Duties of the administrator of the solid and hazardous waste management division.

In addition to the other powers and duties enumerated in this act, the director of the department through the administrator of the solid and hazardous waste management division shall coordinate the activities of all state agencies concerned with solid waste management and disposal. The administrator shall advise and consult with any person or municipality with respect to provisions of technical assistance in solid waste management technology, including collection, storage and disposal.

The administrator of the solid and hazardous waste management division shall enforce and administer this article and the rules, regulations and standards promulgated under this article.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.42; Laws 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Applied

in

Town of Torrington v. Envtl. Quality Council, 557 P.2d 1143,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1976).

Law reviews. —

For comment on solid waste management provisions of the Wyoming Environmental Quality Act of 1973, see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 133 (1974).

§ 35-11-502.
Solid waste management facilities permits; term; renewals.

No person, except when authorized under the permit system established pursuant to this act, shall:

Locate, construct, operate or close a solid waste management facility; or

Modify the design, construction or operation of a solid waste management facility.

No permit for a solid waste management facility shall be transferred without prior written approval of the director. A permit for a solid waste management facility may be transferred only to a person qualified to obtain and hold bonds or other financial assurances required and who meets the management and technical capability requirements under the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this act.

After the effective date of this act no person, except upon a variance from paragraphs (i) through (iv) of this subsection granted by the director upon recommendation of the administrator after public hearing and upon written findings that the variance will not injure or threaten to injure the public health, safety or welfare, shall locate or construct a solid waste management disposal facility larger than one (1) acre within:

One (1) mile of the boundaries of an incorporated city or town;

One (1) mile of a public school except with the written consent of the school district board of trustees or one (1) mile of an occupied dwelling house except with the written consent of the owner;

One-half (1/2) mile of the center line of the right-of-way of a state or federal highway unless screened from view as approved by the department; or

One-half (1/2) mile of a water well permitted or certificated for domestic or stock watering purposes except with written consent of the owner of the permit or certificate.

No person shall accumulate solid waste at a permitted solid waste management facility in excess of a quantity which can be transferred, treated, processed, stored or disposed of within ninety (90) days however, if the solid waste must be transferred more than two hundred (200) miles, then one hundred eighty (180) days.

The administrator shall notify the applicant within sixty (60) days of submission of the application whether or not it is complete. If the administrator deems the application incomplete, he shall so advise and state in writing to the applicant the information required. All items not specified as incomplete at the end of the first sixty (60) day period shall be deemed complete for the purposes of this subsection.

If the applicant resubmits an application or further information, the administrator shall review the application or additional information within sixty (60) days of each submission and advise the applicant in writing if the application or additional information is complete.

After the application is determined complete, the applicant shall give written notice of the application to the county where the applicant plans to locate the facility and to any municipalities which may be affected by the facility. The applicant shall simultaneously cause to be published once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the county where the applicant plans to locate the facility notice of the proposed location, method and length of operation, and such other information as the council may require by rule and regulation. In addition, the council may by rule require an applicant for a proposed permit or for amendment to an existing permit to notify other affected persons of the application and any other information required by the council.

The administrator shall review the application and unless the applicant requests a delay advise the applicant in writing within ninety (90) days from the date of determining the application is complete, that a proposed permit is suitable for publication under subsection (j) of this section, that the application is deficient or that the application is denied. All reasons for deficiency or denial shall be stated in writing to the applicant. All items not specified as being deficient at the end of the first ninety (90) day period shall be deemed complete for the purposes of this subsection. If the applicant submits additional information in response to any deficiency notice, the administrator shall review such additional information within thirty (30) days of submission and advise the applicant in writing if a proposed permit is suitable for publication under subsection (j) of this section, that the application is still deficient or that the director has denied the application.

The applicant shall give written notice of the proposed permit to the governing board of any county where the applicant plans to locate the facility and to any governing board of municipalities which may be affected by the facility. The applicant shall simultaneously cause notice of the proposed permit to be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the county where the applicant plans to locate the facility. The notice shall be published once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks commencing within fifteen (15) days after being notified by the administrator that the application is suitable for publication. The notice shall contain information regarding the identity of the applicant, the location of the proposed operation, the method and length of the operation, the location at which information about the application may be obtained, and the location and final date for filing objections to the application. In addition, the council may by rule require an applicant for a proposed permit or for amendment of an existing permit to notify other affected persons as authorized under subsection (g) of this section.

Any interested person has the right to file written objections to the proposed permit with the director within thirty (30) days after the last publication of the notice given pursuant to subsection (j) of this section. If substantial written objections are filed, a public hearing shall be held within twenty (20) days after the final date for filing objections unless a different period is deemed necessary by the council. The council or director shall publish notice of the time, date and location of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the applicant plans to locate the facility once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks immediately prior to the hearing. The hearing shall be conducted as a contested case in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, and right of judicial review shall be afforded as provided in that act.

The director shall render a decision on the proposed permit within thirty (30) days after completion of the notice period if no hearing is requested. If a hearing is held, the council shall issue findings of fact and a decision on the proposed permit within thirty (30) days after the final hearing. The director shall issue or deny the permit no later than fifteen (15) days from receipt of any findings of fact and decision of the environmental quality council.

Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (f) through (m) of this section, the council shall promulgate rules to establish an alternate permitting procedure for low volume or low hazard solid waste treatment, transfer, processing and storage facilities. The rules shall identify classes or categories of solid waste treatment, transfer, processing and storage facilities which may be permitted using the alternate permitting procedure. The alternate procedure may provide, as determined by the council:

For a single public notice by the applicant, unless the application or permit is contested. If the application or permit is contested the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act regarding public notice shall control;

That public notice shall be limited to notification of interested parties within the area served by the facility or the area where the facility is located;

For a single review by the department to determine completeness and technical adequacy, which shall be completed by the department within thirty (30) days of receipt of an initial or revised application; and

For issuance of a final permit upon completion of all alternate procedure notice and review requirements, provided that any such permit shall be subject to appeal under the provisions of this act.

Effective July 1, 2012, the term for a new or renewed municipal solid waste landfill permit shall be for the lifetime of the solid waste landfill, through closure, not to exceed twenty-five (25) years.

Effective July 1, 2012, for any existing municipal solid waste landfill permit, the next renewal permit shall be converted to a lifetime municipal solid waste permit.

If, during the operation of the municipal solid waste landfill, the life of the municipal solid waste landfill is anticipated to exceed the term specified in the permit, the operator shall:

Submit a municipal solid waste landfill permit amendment which shall include updates on any necessary provisions of the permit;

No later than three (3) years prior to the expiration of the lifetime municipal solid waste landfill permit, submit permit renewal information as required by the department. The municipal solid waste landfill permit may be renewed for another lifetime period, not to exceed twenty-five (25) years.

Notice and opportunity for hearing for an amended municipal solid waste landfill permit shall be as provided for a new municipal solid waste landfill permit under this section.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.43; Laws 1989, ch. 148, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 1993, ch. 130, § 1; 1995, ch. 135, § 1; 1996, ch. 14, § 1; 2011, ch. 110, § 2.

The 2011 amendment,

added (o) through (r).

Laws 2011, ch. 110, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Statutory notice of requirements for establishing new solid waste disposal. —

A municipality has the statutory notice of this section that it cannot establish a new solid waste disposal without prior approval and before establishment must be analyzed for adequacy. Torrington v. Environmental Quality Council, 557 P.2d 1143,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1976).

Waste disposal site held “new site.” —

Where second waste disposal site was on same tract of land as first site but was more than a quarter of a mile away and was reached by a different highway, second site was a “new site” within the meaning of this section. Torrington v. Environmental Quality Council, 557 P.2d 1143,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1976).

Stated

in

Rissler & McMurray Co. v. Environmental Quality Council (In re Bessemer Mt.), 856 P.2d 450,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

§ 35-11-503.
Authority to promulgate rules and regulations for solid waste management facilities and for the management of hazardous wastes.

The director, upon recommendation from the administrator after consultation with the water advisory board, is authorized to recommend that the council promulgate rules, regulations, standards and permit systems for solid waste management facilities in order to protect human health and the environment. The rules, regulations, standards and permit systems shall govern the management of any waste, including liquid, solid, or semisolid waste, which is managed within the boundary of any solid waste management facility, and:

Shall provide requirements as to facility location, design, construction, operation, environmental monitoring, cost effective corrective actions for active facilities, closure, notices of public record, management and technical capabilities of the applicant and post-closure care as necessary to promote the purposes of this act;

Shall provide requirements for bonding or financial assurance to assure that solid waste management facilities will be constructed, operated and closed in accordance with the purposes and provisions of this act and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this act;

Within ten (10) months after the effective date of this act the council shall adopt rules and regulations to implement this act and shall provide such reasonable time as may be necessary, but in no event to exceed twenty-four (24) months after the effective date of this act, for owners and operators of solid waste management facilities to comply with the rules, regulations, standards or permits;

Shall establish categories of solid waste management facilities based on waste type, volume, facility ownership, facility operation or other facility characteristics. Standards and requirements for each category may vary as are necessary to promote the purposes of this act;

Shall provide for consistency and equivalency with rules and regulations adopted by the United States environmental protection agency under authority of Subtitle C of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, P.L. 94-580, as amended, for those facilities subject to such federal requirements, provided that:

The director after consultation with the administrator may petition the council to promulgate rules and regulations more stringent than federal rules if adequate cause exists to determine that circumstances specific to the state compel adoption of more stringent rules to adequately protect the public health and environment of the state;

The imposition of the rules under this paragraph is consistent and equivalent with the imposition of rules by the United States environmental protection agency, except that the director after consultation with the administrator may petition the council to determine for individual permits or orders that adequate cause exists for permit conditions or orders more stringent than federal regulations;

Nothing in this paragraph authorizes the promulgation of rules which are not otherwise authorized in this act.

To the extent not already provided by subsection (a) of this section and W.S.

35-11-504

and notwithstanding W.S.

35-11-424

, the director shall, pursuant to this section or by rule, require applicants for commercial radioactive waste management facility permits to do the following:

Upon the filing of the application, pay a fee to be determined by the director, based upon the estimated cost of investigating, reviewing and processing of the application. Unused fees under this subsection shall be refunded to the applicant;

No less than ten (10) months prior to submission of an application for a commercial radioactive waste management facility permit, submit a notice of intent to file a permit application and a nonrefundable regulatory agency support fee in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00);

Upon receipt of a permit and the filing of each annual report thereunder, pay an annual inspection and monitoring fee to be determined by the director, based upon the estimated costs of inspecting the facility and monitoring compliance with the permit terms. Unused funds shall be credited against the next annual inspection and monitoring fee;

Upon receipt of a permit, establish a long term remediation and monitoring trust for the benefit of the department in an amount sufficient to conduct perpetual monitoring and maintenance of the permitted facility and to remediate the release of any waste or waste constituent in violation of the approved post-closure plan. The long term remediation and monitoring trust may be initially funded by a letter of credit, cash or sufficient bond excepting self-bonds. The letter of credit, cash or bond shall be reduced by an amount equal to the per ton fee levied and paid to the trust during the prior year, provided:

Facilities or portions thereof which the United States government is required by law to accept ownership and assume responsibility for perpetual monitoring, maintenance, and remediation shall not be required to establish a long term remediation and monitoring trust;

Monies actually paid into the long term remediation and monitoring trust on a per ton basis shall be a credit against funds otherwise payable pursuant to W.S. 35-12-113(g)(i); and

All expenses incurred by the department to conduct perpetual monitoring and maintenance of the permitted facility shall be paid by the permittee. The department may contract for temporary professional services to monitor and maintain the permitted facility and to assist in rulemaking.

Reduce, to the extent determined by the director to be technically and economically reasonable, the toxicity of any waste managed at the facility; and

Follow post-closure land uses established for the facility by the director.

Unless and until the council adopts rules pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, for commercial radioactive waste management facilities or a particular classification of commercial radioactive waste management facilities, the director shall rely upon the performance criteria and standards of title 10, part 40, appendix A, and title 40, part 192, subpart D of the Code of Federal Regulations, as of January 1, 1991, as guidance for determining whether an application complies with the act. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the director’s authority to impose permit requirements or conditions or the council’s authority to promulgate rules, consistent with this act, which are more stringent than the federal regulations referenced.

The council shall, upon recommendation from the director and the administrators of the air, water and solid and hazardous waste divisions, promulgate rules and regulations which are:

Necessary for the state to obtain authorization of its hazardous waste management regulatory program to operate in lieu of the federal hazardous waste program administered under subtitle C of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, P.L. 94-580, as amended, provided that the council may not adopt rules requiring imposition of administrative penalties for hazardous waste violations; and

Subject to the limitations on stringency of paragraph (a)(v) of this section, consistent with, and equivalent to rules and regulations adopted by the United States environmental protection agency under authority of subtitle C of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, P.L. 94-580, as amended.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.44; Laws 1989, ch. 148, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; ch. 88, § 1; 1994, ch. 82, § 2; 1995, ch. 139, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (c), substituted “subsection (a)” for “paragraph (a)” in the first sentence, and “or” for “on” in the last sentence.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Resource Conservation and Recovery Act. —

Subtitle C of the federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a)(v) and in subsections (d)(i) and (d)(ii), appears as 42 U.S.C. §§ 6921 through 6939e.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Rules for establishment of solid waste sites not required. —

There is no requirement that with respect to solid waste sites there must be rules and regulations for their establishment. This section provides only for rules pertaining to operation, not establishment of solid waste sites. Torrington v. Environmental Quality Council, 557 P.2d 1143,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1976).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “State Sovereignty—Back to the Future: The Supreme Court Reaffirms State Sovereignty in Cooperative Federalism Solutions to Environmental Problems. New York v. United States, 505 U.S. 144, 112 S. Ct. 2408, 120 L. Ed. 2d 120, 1992 U.S. LEXIS 3693 (1992),” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 117 (1994).

§ 35-11-504.
Bonding for solid waste management facilities.

The council, by rules and regulations, shall establish bonding or financial assurance requirements for solid waste management facilities to assure there are adequate sources of funds to provide for cost effective:

Closure costs, post-closure inspection and maintenance costs, and environmental monitoring and control costs, including but not limited to costs for:

Removal and disposal of buildings, fences, roads and other facility developments, and reclamation of affected lands;

Construction of any waste cover or containment system required as a condition of any facility permit;

Removal and off-site treatment or disposal of any wastes that are being stored or treated;

Decontamination, dismantling and removal of any waste storage, treatment or disposal equipment or vessels;

Operating any environmental monitoring systems or pollution control systems that are required as a condition of any facility permit or by order of the director; and

Conducting, only for disposal facilities, periodic post-closure inspections of cover systems, surface water diversion structures, monitor wells or systems, pollutant detection and control systems, and performing maintenance activities to correct deficiencies that are discovered.

In the event of any discharge of pollution to the air, land or to waters of the state which is in violation of a permit, standard, rule or requirement established under the provisions of this act, the estimated costs of remedying or abating the violation or damages caused by the violation;

The bond established under paragraph (i) of this subsection shall be available during the operating life and throughout the post-closure care period of the solid waste management facility to abate or remedy any violation of a permit, standard, rule or requirement established under the provisions of this act.

The amount of any bond or financial assurance requirement shall be established by the director in accordance with procedures contained in rules and regulations of the council, but shall not be less than an amount sufficient to satisfy the purposes specified in subsection (a) of this section.

Rules and regulations of the council promulgated to implement the bonding or financial assurance requirements of this section shall exempt any solid waste management facility:

Owned or operated by a municipality provided that the facility is a participating facility under W.S. 35-11-515(o)(iii);

Owned and operated by the person disposing of solid waste generated at the facility who annually demonstrates to the director compliance with the financial responsibility requirements of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, P.L. 94-580, as amended as of January 1, 1989 [42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq.];

Which is also subject to bonding or financial assurance requirements under article 2, 3 or 4 of this act if the director determines that the bond or financial assurances under article 2, 3 or 4 satisfy the requirements of this section;

Which is subject to bonding or financial assurance requirements under W.S. 30-5-104(d)(i)(D) or 30 U.S.C. § 226(g) as amended as of January 1, 1989; or

Owned or operated by an electric utility disposing of solid waste generated by an electric generation facility pursuant to a permit or license issued by the department, provided that the exemption may be revoked by the council upon petition of the director for a period of time established by the council to secure remedial action in the event of any discharge of pollution to the air, land or to waters of the state which is in violation of a permit, standard, rule or requirement established under the provisions of this act.

The council shall provide rules for the establishment of a self-bonding program to be used if such a program will provide protection consistent with the objectives and purposes of article 5 of the act. In any such program, rules of the council shall provide for a timely reappraisal of pledged assets, require evidence of a suitable agent to receive service of process, assure that pledged assets are not already pledged for other projects, provide that pledged assets reside continuously in the state of Wyoming and provide for determination of the suitability of pledged assets.

In lieu of a bond, the operator may deposit federally insured certificates of deposit payable to the Wyoming department of environmental quality, cash, government securities, or irrevocable letters of credit issued by a bank organized to do business in the United States, or all four (4).

Any bond may be cancelled by the surety only after ninety (90) days written notice to the director, and upon receipt of the director’s written consent, which may be granted only when the requirements of the bond have been fulfilled.

If the license to do business in Wyoming of any surety upon a bond filed pursuant to this act is suspended or revoked by any state authority then the operator, within thirty (30) days after receiving notice thereof, shall substitute a good and sufficient corporate surety licensed to do business in the state. Upon failure of the operator to make substitution of surety within a reasonable period of time, not to exceed sixty (60) days, the director shall suspend the permit of the operator to accept solid wastes until proper substitution has been made.

Bond forfeiture proceedings shall occur only after the department provides notice to the operator and surety pursuant to W.S.

35-11-701

that a violation exists and the council has approved the request of the director to begin forfeiture proceedings.

With the approval of the council the director may:

Expend forfeited funds to remedy and abate the circumstances with respect to which the bond was provided; and

Expend funds from the account under W.S.

35-11-424

to remedy and abate any immediate danger to human health, safety and welfare.

If the forfeited bond or other financial assurance instrument is inadequate to cover the costs to carry out the activities specified in subsection (a) of this section, or in any case where the department has expended account monies under subsection (j) of this section, the attorney general shall bring suit to recover the cost of performing the activities where recovery is deemed possible.

When the director determines that the violation has been remedied or the damage abated, the director shall release that portion of the bond or financial assurance instrument being held under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section. When the director determines that closure activities have been successfully completed at any solid waste management facility, the director shall release that portion of the bond or financial assurance instrument being held to guarantee performance of activities specified in subparagraphs (a)(i)(A) through (E) of this section. For solid waste management facilities other than landfills for the disposal of municipal wastes, the remaining portion of the bond or financial assurance instrument shall be held for a period of not less than five (5) years after the date of facility closure, or so long thereafter as necessary to assure proper performance of any post-closure activities specified in subparagraph (a)(i)(F) of this section. For municipal solid waste management facilities, the period shall be the minimum necessary to comply with P.L. 94-580. The retained portion of the bond or other financial assurance instrument may be returned to the operator at an earlier date if the director determines that the facility has been adequately stabilized and that environmental monitoring or control systems have demonstrated that the facility closure is protective of public health and the environment consistent with the purposes of this act.

No supplemental bond or financial assurance shall be required of any facility, mine, permit or license subject to the bond or financial assurance requirements of article 2, 3 or 4 of this act, to meet the requirements of this section, for any solid waste management facility used solely for the management of wastes generated within the boundary of the permitted facility or mine operation by the facility or mine owner or operator, or from a mine mouth electric power plant or coal drier.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 148, § 1; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 1993, ch. 114, § 2; 1994, ch. 36, § 1; 1995, ch. 24, § 1; 1996, ch. 60, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “trust and agency” preceding “account” in (j)(ii) and (k).

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “P.L. 94-580” for “P.L. 94-584” in (m).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 1989, ch. 205, § 1, also enacted a §

35-11-504

, which has been renumbered as §

35-11-508

.Laws 1989, ch. 78, § 1, also enacted a §

35-11-504

, which has been renumbered as §

35-11-509

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Resource Conservation and Recovery Act. —

The federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (P.L. 94-580) referred to in subsection (c)(ii), and in the next-to-last sentence in subsection (m), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq.

§ 35-11-505.
Existing regulations remain in effect.

The Wyoming solid waste management rules and regulations, promulgated by the council in 1975 and amended in 1980, shall remain in effect until amended, repealed or otherwise revised by the council.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 148, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1989, ch. 78, § 1, also enacted a §

35-11-505

, which has been renumbered as §

35-11-510

.

§ 35-11-506.
Applications subject to penalty of perjury.

All applications submitted pursuant to this chapter shall be signed under oath subject to penalty of perjury by the applicant if an individual, by at least one (1) principal if the application is for a partnership or joint venture, or by at least two (2) principal officers if the application is for a corporation.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 148, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to perjury in judicial, legislative or administrative proceedings, see §

6-5-301

.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1989, ch. 78, § 1, also enacted a §

35-11-506

, which has been renumbered as §

35-11-511

.

§ 35-11-507.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 102, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1989, ch. 148, § 1, related to annual fees for solid waste management facilities.

§ 35-11-508.
Recycling and processing requirements for commercial solid waste management facilities.

In recognition of the need to minimize unnecessary uses of the land for solid waste management, to allow for an effective ability for state oversight, regulation and inspection of solid wastes intended to be managed in the state and to conserve natural resources in accord with the policy and purpose of this act, commercial solid waste management facilities shall conform to the following operating practices:

Solid wastes shall be screened by the facility operator in a manner approved by the director to assure to the maximum practical extent that wastes prohibited from disposal at the facility are not managed or disposed of at the facility. Management or disposal of any prohibited waste by a facility shall be cause for the council to issue a cessation order preventing continued receipt of solid wastes at the facility. The order shall remain in effect until the director approves a revised waste screening plan submitted by the facility operator which the director deems sufficient to prevent receipt of wastes prohibited from disposal at the facility;

Solid wastes shall be processed within the state to facilitate inspections of processing by the department, and removal and recovery of useful components of the waste stream as required by this section, using processes found to be acceptable in rules and regulations promulgated by the council including but not limited to grinding, shredding, incineration or composting;

Rules and regulations of the council shall establish minimum acceptable removal and recovery rates for useful components of the solid waste stream. Such rates may be established for the facility as a whole, or may differ for different components of the solid waste stream;

Following adoption by the council of rules and regulations to implement this section, disposal of useful components of the solid waste stream shall be prohibited at any land disposal facility in the state;

Residues remaining following processing, separation and reclamation of useful components of the solid waste stream shall be treated, stored or disposed in compliance with the requirements of this act.

For purposes of this section useful components of the solid waste stream include but are not limited to energy, glass, ferrous and nonferrous metals, paper products and organic matter.

Compliance with the requirements of this section for commercial solid waste management facilities does not limit any other requirements which may be applicable to such facilities under the act, nor any applicable local rule or ordinance.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 205, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

35-11-504

.

Editor's notes. —

This section was enacted as §

35-11-504

. As Laws 1989, ch. 148, also enacted a §

35-11-504

, this section has been renumbered as §

35-11-508

. See, also, §§

35-11-509

and

35-11-513

and notes thereto.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-509.
Lead acid batteries; land disposal prohibited.

No person shall place a used lead acid battery in mixed municipal solid waste, discard or otherwise dispose of a lead acid battery except by delivery to an automotive battery retailer or wholesaler, to a collection or recycling facility authorized under the laws of Wyoming, or to a secondary lead smelter permitted by the environmental protection agency.

No automotive battery retailer shall dispose of a used lead acid battery except by delivery to the agent of a battery wholesaler, to a battery manufacturer for delivery to a secondary lead smelter permitted by the environmental protection agency, to a collection or recycling facility authorized under the laws of Wyoming or to a secondary lead smelter permitted by the environmental protection agency.

Each battery improperly disposed of shall constitute a separate violation.

Each violation of this section is a misdemeanor subject to a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00).

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 78, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

35-11-504

.

Editor's notes. —

This section was enacted as §

35-11-504

. As Laws 1989, ch. 148, also enacted a §

35-11-504

, this section has been renumbered as §

35-11-509

. See, also, §

35-11-508

and notes thereto.

§ 35-11-510.
Lead acid batteries; collection for recycling.

A person selling lead acid batteries at retail or offering lead acid batteries for retail sale in the state shall:

Accept, at the point of transfer, in a quantity at least equal to the number of new batteries purchased per year, used lead acid batteries from customers, if offered by customers; and

Post written notice which shall be at least eight and one-half (8 1/2) inches by eleven (11) inches in size and shall contain the universal recycling symbol and the following language:

It is illegal to discard a motor vehicle battery or other lead acid battery;

Recycle your used batteries; and

State law requires us to accept used motor vehicle batteries or other lead acid batteries for recycling in exchange for new batteries purchased.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 78, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

35-11-505

.

Editor's notes. —

This section was enacted as §

35-11-505

. As Laws 1989, ch. 148, also enacted a §

35-11-505

, this section has been renumbered as §

35-11-510

.

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.